Nebraska, session 109, LB10.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 71-7455, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-7455 (1) A wholesale drug distributor engaged in the wholesale
distribution of prescription drugs in this state shall establish and maintain
accurate records of all transactions regarding the receipt and distribution or
other disposition of prescription drugs as provided in this section.
(2) The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
require that all prescription drugs that leave the normal distribution chain be
accompanied by a paper or electronic pedigree as provided in section 71-7456.
Such rules and regulations shall be adopted and promulgated no later than July
1, 2007.
(3) A wholesale drug distributor engaged in the wholesale distribution of
prescription drugs as part of the Prescription Drug Donation Program Act shall
not be required to maintain a paper or electronic pedigree pursuant to section
71-7456.
(4) (3) The department shall develop standards and requirements for
electronic pedigrees in order to effectively authenticate, track, and trace
prescription drugs. Prior to the development of such standards and
requirements, the department shall consult with the federal Food and Drug
Administration, manufacturers, wholesale drug distributors, pharmacies, and
other interested parties regarding the feasibility and the ways, means, and
practicality of requiring that all prescription drugs that leave the normal
distribution chain be accompanied by an electronic pedigree. The standards and
requirements may prescribe the information required to be included as part of
the electronic pedigree. Such standards and requirements shall be developed no
later than July 1, 2008. All prescription drugs that leave the normal
distribution chain shall not be required to be accompanied solely by an
electronic pedigree prior to such date.
(5) (4) A retail pharmacy or chain pharmacy warehouse shall comply with
the requirements of this section only if the pharmacy or chain pharmacy
warehouse engages in the wholesale distribution of prescription drugs in this
state.
(6) (5) A wholesale drug distributor, other than the original manufacturer
of the finished form of the prescription drug, shall verify all transactions
listed on the pedigree before attempting to further distribute such drug.
(7)(a) The department may receive prescription drugs and supplies directly
under the Prescription Drug Donation Program Act and dispense such prescription
drugs and supplies through licensed personnel during, or in preparation for, a
state of emergency declared by the Governor.
(b) The department may receive and distribute prescription drugs and
supplies to any individual who is impacted as a result of a state of emergency
declared by the Governor.
Sec. 2. Original section 71-7455, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is repealed.
Sec. 3. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-1-